Wisconsin, session 2025, SB432.
do enact as follows:SB432,1Section 1. 48.981 (2) (a) 10. of the statutes is amended to read:48.981 (2) (a) 10. A social worker, as defined in s. 457.01 (10).SB432,2Section 2. 48.981 (2) (a) 31. of the statutes is created to read:48.981 (2) (a) 31. An employee of an agency whose duties include direct interaction with children or the handling of child welfare cases.SB432,3Section 3. 48.981 (3) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:48.981 (3) (a) 3. Except as provided in sub. (3m), a county department, the department, or a licensed child welfare agency under contract with the department shall within 12 hours, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, or legal holidays, refer to the sheriff or police department all cases of suspected or threatened abuse, as defined in s. 48.02 (1) (b) to (f), reported to it. For cases of suspected or threatened abuse, as defined in s. 48.02 (1) (a), (am), (g), or (gm), or neglect, each county department, the department, and a licensed child welfare agency under contract with the department shall adopt a written policy specifying the kinds of reports it will routinely report to local law enforcement authorities. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb432 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb432 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB432 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB432 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB432: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting